Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 421.21 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Contingent upon the availability of funds, the District
Attorneys Council shall develop and implement a five-year Domestic
Violence Forensic Exam Pilot Program. The purpose of the Domestic
Violence Forensic Exam Pilot Program shall be to provide counties
with qualified licensed health care professionals who shall conduct
domestic violence forensic exams for victims of domestic violence
ENGR. H. B. NO. 2606 Page 1

assa ult. In conjunction with the Domestic Violence Forensic Exam
Pilot Program, a Domestic Violence Examination Fund shall be
established in each participating county for the purpose of
providing to a victim of domestic violence assault, a forensic
medical examination by a qualified licensed health care
professional.
B. As used in this section:
1. "Domestic violence" means any act of physical harm or the
threat of imminent physical harm which is committed by an adult,
emancipated minor, or minor child thirteen (13) years of age or
older against another adult, emancipated minor, or minor child who
is currently or was previously an intimate partner or family or
household member;
2. "Intimate partner" means:
a. current or former spouses,
b. persons who are in a dating relationship,
c. persons who are the biological parents of the same
child, regardless of marital status or whether they
have lived together at any time, and
d. persons who currently or formerly lived together in an
intimate way, primarily characterized by affectionate
or sexual involvement. A sexual relationship may be
an indicator that a person is an intimate partner, but
is never a necessary condition;
ENGR. H. B. NO. 2606 Page 2

3. "Household member" means:
a. persons who regularly reside in the same single-
dwelling unit,
b. persons who resided in the same single-dwelling unit
within the past year, or
c. persons who have individual lease agreements whereby
each person has his or her own private bedroom and
shares common areas; and
4. "Qualified licensed health care professional" means a
physician, registered nurse, or other licensed health care
professional qualified by completion of a forty-hour didactic
domestic violence examiners course, as well as successful completion
of clinical competence.
C. The Crime Victims Compensation Board shall establish the
procedures for disbursement of the Domestic Violence Examination
Fund, but in no event shall the Crime Victims Compensation Board pay
an amount to exceed Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) for a domestic
violence forensic exam. Such payments shall not exceed the amounts
specified by this subsection regardless of the amount of any
individual bills comprising the claim. Payments shall be made only
upon claims signed by the victim or guardian and qualified licensed
health care professional.
D. The District Attorneys Council is hereby authorized to
transfer funds, as specified in the appropriations bill annually,
ENGR. H. B. NO. 2606 Page 3

from the Crime Victims Compensation Fund to the Domestic Violence
Examination Fund for the payment of domestic violence forensic
exams, pursuant to this section.
E. The District Attorneys Council shall have the authority to
make any contract, execute any document, or perform any act in order
to carry out the Domestic Violence Forensic Exam Pilot Program.
F. Nothing in this section shall prevent the Legislature from
appropriating funds to the Domestic Violence Examination Fund for
the payment of domestic violence forensic examinations.
G. Counties with a population of more than three hundred
thousand (300,000) according to the latest Federal Decennial Census
may participate in the pilot program. Subject to available funding,
the Crime Victims Compensation Board is authorized to allow counties
with a population of less than three hundred thousand (300,000)
according to the latest Federal Decennial Census to participate in
the pilot program.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.







ENGR. H. B. NO. 2606 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 26th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of ___________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 2606 Page 5